Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-1003
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of
the Nebraska Advantage Transformational Tourism and Redevelopment Act, the
definitions found in sections 77-1004 to 77-1027 shall be used.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 3.